South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4389.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 11, Title 25 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 25-11-730. (A)(1) The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall adopt and execute criteria, policies, and procedures for admissions to and discharges from South Carolina veterans' homes. (2) Within sixty days of adopting or amending any admissions or discharge criteria, policies, or procedures for South Carolina veterans' homes, the Department of Veterans' Affairs shall submit, for informational purposes only, the full text of such criteria, policies, or procedures to the House Government Efficiency and Legislative Oversight Committee and Senate Legislative Oversight Committee. (3) The criteria submitted pursuant to item (2) must be accompanied by a summary of stakeholder engagement and an analysis of potential impacts on low-income, disabled, and minority veterans. The department also shall make these policies publicly accessible through its website and update them promptly upon any revisions. (B) The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall set and collect fees for residence in and services provided by South Carolina veterans' homes. (C) The Department of Veterans' Affairs is authorized to receive, as full or partial payment of any fees charged by a South Carolina veteran home, the assignment of any state or federal benefit. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----